Delaware, session 153, HB117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Part II, Title 3 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Chapter 20. STATE-OWNED AGRICULTURAL LAND LEASES Â§ 2001. Definitions. For purposes of this chapter âState-owned agricultural landâ means land of 10 acres or more that is owned by the State or a political subdivision of the State and that is used or intended to be used for agricultural use as defined under Â§ 902 of this title. Â§ 2002. Notice requirements. (a) When the State or a political subdivision thereof seeks bids to lease State-owned agricultural land, notice of the request for bids must be provided to the Delaware Farm Bureau or successor of that organization to be distributed or made available to farmers. (b) The notice requirement under subsection (a) of this section is in addition to any other notice required for procurement of bids to lease State-owned property under State or local law, ordinance, or regulation.